Utah statutes.
19-2-116.   Injunction or other remedies to prevent violations -- Civil actions not abridged.

(1)  Action under Section 19-2-115  does not bar enforcement of this chapter, or any of the rules adopted under it or any orders made under it by injunction or other appropriate remedy.  The board has the power to institute and maintain in the name of the state any and all enforcement proceedings.

(2)  This chapter does not abridge, limit, impair, create, enlarge, or otherwise affect substantively or procedurally the right of any person to damages or other relief on account of injury to persons or property and to maintain any action or other appropriate proceeding for this purpose.

(3) (a)  In addition to any other remedy created in this chapter, upon failure of any person to comply with any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it or any final order made by the board, the executive secretary, or the executive director and when it appears necessary for the protection of health and welfare, the board may initiate through its executive secretary an action for appropriate injunctive relief.

(b)  The attorney general shall bring injunctive relief actions on request.

(c)  A bond is not required.

